California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(b) The extension of a plan approved by the director pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to have also met the consent requirements of Section 3257 if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The plan met the consent requirements of Section 3257 when initially adopted.

(2) The plan provides for both of the following:

(A) Each employee to whom the plan is applicable shall be given written notice of his or her right to reject coverage under the plan and a written statement setting forth the essential features of the plan prior to or at the time of employment. The form of the notice and of the statement shall be approved by the director.

(B) On or before January 31 of each calendar year, each employee shall be given written notice, in a form approved by the director, of his or her right to withdraw from the plan at the beginning of any calendar quarter upon giving reasonable notice in writing directed to the motion picture payroll services company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 391, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

682.

(a) “Employer” also means any employing unit which employs individuals to perform domestic service in a private home, local college club, or local chapter of a college fraternity or sorority and pays wages in cash of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more for such service during any calendar quarter in the calendar year or the preceding calendar year.

(b) Any employing unit which qualifies as an employer under this section shall not be treated as an employer with respect to wages paid for any service other than domestic service specified by this section unless such employing unit also qualifies as an employer with respect to such other service under Section 675, 676, 677, or 678.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

683.

“Employer” also means any employing unit which employs individuals to perform domestic service comprising in-home supportive services under Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300), Chapter 3, Part 3, Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and pays wages in cash of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more for such service during any calendar quarter in the calendar year or the preceding calendar year, and is one of the following:

(a) The recipient of such services, if the state or county makes or provides for direct payment to a provider chosen by the recipient or to the recipient of such services for the purchase of services, subject to the provisions of Section 12302.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) The individual or entity with whom a county contracts to provide in-home supportive services.

(c) Any county which hires and directs in-home supportive personnel in accordance with established county civil service requirements or merit system requirements for those counties not having civil service systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

684.

(a) Solely for the purposes of Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of this division, “employer” also means any employing unit which employs individuals to perform domestic service in a private home, local college club, or local chapter of a college fraternity or sorority and pays wages in cash of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) or more to individuals employed in such service during any calendar quarter in the calendar year or the preceding calendar year.

(b) Any employing unit which qualifies as an employer under this section shall not be treated as an employer with respect to wages paid for any service other than domestic service specified by this section unless such employing unit also qualifies as an employer with respect to such other service under Section 675, 676, 677, or 678.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

685.

Solely for the purposes of Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of this division, “employer” also means any employing unit which employs individuals to perform domestic service comprising in-home supportive services under Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and pays wages in cash of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) or more to individuals employed in such service during any calendar quarter in the calendar year or preceding calendar year, and is one of the following:

(a) The recipient of the services, if the state or county makes or provides for direct payment to a provider chosen by the recipient or to the recipient of the services for the purchase of services, subject to the provisions of Section 12302.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) The individual or entity with which a county contracts to provide in-home supportive services.

(c) Any county which hires and directs in-home supportive personnel in accordance with established county civil service requirements or merit system requirements for those counties not having civil service systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1025, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

686.

“Employer” also means any person contracting for the creation of a specially ordered or commissioned work of authorship when the parties expressly agree in a written instrument signed by them that the work shall be considered a work made for hire, as defined in Section 101 of Title 17 of the United States Code, and the ordering or commissioning party obtains ownership of all of the rights comprised in the copyright in the work. The ordering or commissioning party shall be the employer of the author of the work for the purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1332, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

687.2.

Notwithstanding any other law, an employment agency, as defined in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or subdivision (h) of Section 1812.501 of the Civil Code, shall not be deemed to be the employer of the domestic workers for whom it procures, offers, refers, provides, or attempts to provide work if all of the following factors exist:

(a) There is a signed contract or agreement between the employment agency and the domestic worker that contains, at a minimum, provisions that specify all of the following:

(1) That the employment agency shall assist the domestic worker in securing work.

(2) How the employment agency’s referral fee shall be paid.

(3) That the domestic worker is free to sign an agreement with other employment agencies and to perform domestic work for persons not referred by the employment agency.

(b) The domestic worker informs the employment agency of any restrictions on hours, location, conditions, or type of work he or she will accept and the domestic worker is free to select or reject any work opportunity procured, offered, referred, or provided by the
 employment agency.

(c) The domestic worker is free to renegotiate with the person hiring him or her the amount proposed to be paid for the work.

(d) The domestic worker does not receive any training from the employment agency with respect to the performance of domestic work. However, an employment agency may provide a voluntary orientation session in which the relationship between the employment agency and the domestic worker, including the employment agency’s administrative and operating procedures, and the provisions of the contract or agreement between the employment agency and the domestic worker are explained.

(e) The domestic worker performs domestic work without any direction, control, or supervision exercised by the employment agency with respect to the manner and means of performing the domestic work.

The following actions exercised by an employment agency shall not be considered to be the exercise of direction, control, or supervision:

(1) Informing the domestic worker about the services to be provided and the conditions of work specified by the person seeking to hire a domestic worker.

(2) Contacting the person who has hired the domestic worker to determine whether that person is satisfied with the agency’s referral service. This contact shall not be used to identify improvements needed in a worker’s performance and to then discipline or train the worker regarding the performance of domestic work.

(3) Informing the domestic worker of the time during which new referrals are available.

(4) Requesting the
 domestic worker to inform the employment agency if the domestic worker is unable to perform the work accepted.

(f) The employment agency does not provide tools, supplies, or equipment necessary to perform the domestic work.

(g) The domestic worker is not obligated to pay the employment agency’s referral fee, and the employment agency is not obligated to pay the domestic worker if the person for whom the services were performed fails or refuses to pay for the domestic work.

(h) Payments for domestic services are made directly to either the domestic worker or to the employment agency. Payments made directly to the employment agency shall be deposited into a trust account until payment can be made to the domestic worker. Payments made to the domestic worker by the employment agency shall not be paid from any of the
 employment agency’s business accounts.

(i) The relationship between a domestic worker and the person for whom the domestic worker performs services may only be terminated by either of those parties and not by the employment agency that referred the domestic worker. However, an employment agency may decline to make additional referrals to a particular domestic worker, and the domestic worker may decline to accept a particular referral.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 117, Sec. 2.   (AB 1695)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Elective Coverage [701. - 713.]

701.

An employing unit, not otherwise subject to this division, which files with the director its written election to become an employer for not less than two calendar years, shall, with the written approval of the election by the director, become an employer subject to this division to the same extent as other employers as of the date stated in the approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2156.)
-------------------------------------------

702.

Except as provided by Sections 702.1, 709, and 710, any employing unit for which services that do not constitute employment are performed, may file with the director a written election that all such services performed by individuals in its employ in one or more distinct establishments or places of business shall be deemed to constitute employment by an employer for all the purposes of this division for not less than two calendar years. Upon the written approval of the election by the director, such services shall be deemed to constitute employment subject to this division from and after the date stated in the approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

702.1.

(a) As used in this section, “nonprofit organization” means any corporation, community chest, fund, or foundation for which services that constitute employment under Section 608 are performed and for which other services that do not constitute employment are performed, or any nonprofit organization described in Section 608 for which all services performed do not constitute employment. 

(b) No election filed by a nonprofit organization under Section 702 shall be effective for service performed after December 31, 1971. All elections for coverage filed by a nonprofit organization under Section 702 prior to January 1, 1972, shall be terminated effective December 31, 1971.

(c) Any nonprofit organization for which any services that do not constitute employment are performed may, when requested by a written petition signed by a majority of its employees to be covered by the election, file with the director a written election that the services performed in one or more distinct establishments or places of business and to be covered by the election shall be deemed to constitute employment by an employer for all the purposes of this division for not less than two calendar years. If the director finds that a majority of the employees to be covered by the election have signed the petition, a nonprofit organization shall, upon the written approval of the director, become an employer with respect to such services subject to this division to the same extent as other employers, and services performed by its employees covered by the election, shall constitute employment subject to this division. Beginning at that time it shall withhold from the wages of employees covered by the election the contributions required for unemployment compensation disability benefits.

(d) A nonprofit organization may exclude from coverage under an election pursuant to this section any service excluded under Section 634.5.

(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (d), a nonprofit organization shall not exclude from unemployment compensation disability coverage under an election pursuant to this section any service that is included in “employment” for the purposes of Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of this division.

(f) In lieu of the contributions required of employers, each nonprofit organization that has elected coverage under this section may elect any method of financing coverage by an election under this section that is permitted under Section 803. Subdivision (c) of Section 801 shall apply to any such election under Section 803.

(g) Except as inconsistent with the provisions of this section, the provisions of this division and authorized regulations shall apply to any matter arising pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

702.5.

Any employing unit for which services that do not constitute employment under Section 631 are performed, may file with the director a written election, agreed to by both the employing unit and the individuals in its employ specified in Section 631, that all such services performed by such individuals in one or more distinct establishments or places of business shall be deemed to constitute employment by an employer for all the purposes of Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of this division. Upon the written approval of the election by the director, such services shall be deemed to constitute employment subject to such part from and after the date stated in the approval. Sections 704 and 707 shall apply to elections under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1447.)
-------------------------------------------

702.6.

(a) Any employing unit who is an employer under this division may file with the director a written election to cover, for the purposes of Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) only, services performed by any of the following:

(1) All eligible employees who are a part of a labor organization, provided the election is the result of a negotiated agreement between the employer and the recognized employee organization.

(2) All eligible employees in its employ in one or more distinct establishments or places of business who are not part of a labor organization, when the election is requested by a written petition signed by a majority of the eligible employees to be covered by the election.

(b) “Eligible employee,” as used in this section, means an employee who is a California resident whose services are covered under the unemployment compensation laws of another state which does not have a disability insurance program, and who is an “employee,” as defined in Section 13004, for whom the employer complies with the personal income tax withholding provisions of Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000).

(c) Upon the filing of an election, the filing entity shall, upon approval by the director, become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) to the same extent as other employers, and services performed by its employees who are subject to the election shall be deemed to constitute employment subject to that part. Sections 704, 707, 986, and 2903 shall apply to elections under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 475, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

703.

Services not included within “employment” and performed entirely without this State, with respect to no part of which contributions are required and paid under an unemployment compensation law of any other state or of the Federal Government, shall be deemed to be employment if the individual performing such services is a resident of this State and the director approves the election of the employing unit for whom the services are performed that the entire service of such individual shall be deemed to be employment subject to this division. Such election shall be for the period, made in the manner, and subject to termination as provided in this article for other elections of coverage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

704.

The director shall not approve an election under Section 701, 702, 702.1, 702.5, 703, 708, or 708.5 if he or she finds that any of the following conditions exist:

(a) The self-employed individual is currently unable to perform his or her regular and customary work due to injury or illness.

(b) The employing unit or self-employed individual is not normally and continuously engaged in a regular trade, business, or occupation.

(c) The employing unit or self-employed individual intends to discontinue the regular trade, business or occupation within eight calendar quarters.

(d) The regular trade, business, or occupation of the employing unit or self-employed individual is seasonal in its operations.

(e) The major portion of the self-employed individual’s remuneration is not derived from his or her trade, business, or occupation.

(f) The self-employed individual is unable to provide a copy of his or her Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE as reported on or before April 15 of the preceding year showing a net profit of at least four thousand six hundred dollars ($4,600) or to certify to an average net profit of at least one thousand one hundred fifty dollars ($1,150) per quarter since becoming self-employed or for the preceding four quarters, whichever period is less.

(g) The employing unit or self-employed individual has failed to make a return or report, or to pay contributions within the time required by this division and there is an unpaid amount of contributions owing by the employing unit or self-employed individual.

(h) (1) A prior elective coverage agreement entered into pursuant to Section 708 or 708.5 has been terminated by the department under Section 704.1 or by means of a written application for termination as required by this division, and the individual has not completed a waiting period of 18 consecutive months from the date of termination.

(2) The waiting period for reinstatement to the elective coverage program may be waived for any individual who becomes eligible for coverage after being terminated under paragraph (1), (2), (4), or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 704.1, upon receipt by the department of an application for coverage to be effective the first day of the quarter in which the application is received.

(i) The employing unit or any officer or agent of or person having charge of the affairs of the employing unit, or the self-employed individual has been convicted within the preceding eight consecutive calendar quarters of any violation under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2101). For the purposes of this subdivision, a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction irrespective of whether an order granting probation or other order is made suspending the imposition of the sentence or whether sentence is imposed but execution thereof is suspended.

(j) For purposes of this section, Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE is defined as Internal Revenue Service Form 1040 Schedule SE, or in the case of statutory employees under the Internal Revenue Code, it shall be defined as Internal Revenue Service Form 1040 Schedule C, or the California Income Tax Return, when accompanied by Internal Revenue Service Form W-2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1049, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

704.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the director may terminate any elective coverage agreement under this article if he or she finds that any of the following conditions exist:

(1) The employing unit or self-employed individual is not normally and continuously engaged in a regular trade, business, or occupation.

(2) The employing unit or self-employed individual has discontinued the regular trade, business, or occupation.

(3) The regular trade, business, or occupation of the employing unit or self-employed individual is seasonal in its operations.

This paragraph shall not apply to any public entity.

(4) The major portion of the self-employed individual’s remuneration is not derived from his or her trade, business, or occupation.

(5) The self-employed individual reports a net profit of less than four thousand six hundred dollars ($4,600) on his or her Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE for a third consecutive year.

(6) The employing unit or self-employed individual has failed to make a return or report, or to pay contributions within the time required by this division and there is an unpaid amount of contributions owing by the employing unit or self-employed individual, except when the elective coverage agreement has been in effect for less than two complete calendar years.

(7) The employing unit or self-employed individual, or a representative thereof, is found by the director to have filed a false statement in order to be considered eligible for elective coverage.

(8) The employing unit or any officer or agent of or person having charge of the affairs of the employing unit, or the self-employed individual is convicted of any violation pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2101). For the purposes of this paragraph, a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction irrespective of whether an order granting probation or other order is made suspending the imposition of the sentence or whether sentence is imposed but execution thereof is suspended.

(b) The director shall give to the employing unit, or to the self-employed individual, a written notice pursuant to Section 1206 of the director’s termination of the elective coverage agreement under this section. The date of termination may be the end of the calendar quarter immediately preceding the existence of any condition specified in subdivision (a), or the end of any subsequent calendar quarter thereafter, as determined by the director.

Any termination of elective coverage shall not affect the liability of the employing unit or self-employed individual for any contributions due, owing, and unpaid to the department.

(c) Sections 1222, 1223, and 1224 shall apply to matters arising under this section.

(d) For purposes of this section, Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE is defined as Internal Revenue Service Form 1040 Schedule SE, or in the case of statutory employees under the Internal Revenue Code, it shall be defined as Internal Revenue Service Form 1040 Schedule C, or the California Income Tax Return, when accompanied by Internal Revenue Service Form W-2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1049, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

704.2.

For purposes of Sections 704 and 704.1:

(a) “Normally and continuously engaged in a regular trade, business, or occupation” means both of the following:

(1) Regularly performing services and engaging in an uninterrupted pattern of work that is customary for the individual’s trade, business, or occupation.

(2) In the case of a self-employed individual or individual who is an employer is in a trade, business, or occupation that requires a valid and active license, that individual has been issued that license. An individual operating a business without a required license shall not be considered normally engaged in a trade, business, or occupation.

(b) “Seasonal in its operations” means any of the following:

(1) The trade, business, or occupation is not continuous or carried on throughout the year.

(2) The operation of the trade, business, or occupation is temporarily or intermittently suspended for regularly recurring periods of time.

(3) The performance of services in the trade, business, or occupation is regularly suspended due to weather, climate, or other conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 747, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

705.

(a) An elective coverage agreement approved by the director pursuant to any section of this article may be terminated as of January 1st of any calendar year only if the agreement has been in effect for two calendar years and if the employing unit or self-employed individual, on or before the 31st day of January of that year, has filed with the director a written application for termination. 

(b) An elective coverage agreement entered into prior to January 1, 1994, pursuant to Section 708 or 708.5 may be terminated on January 1, 1994, if the self-employed individual files a written application for termination with the director on or before June 30, 1994.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 747, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

706.

The director may for good cause waive the requirement of Section 705 that a written application for termination shall be filed on or before the thirty-first day of January.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1165.)
-------------------------------------------

707.

Every employing unit which files an election to become an employer pursuant to Section 701, 702, 702.1, 702.5, 703, 709, or 710, or an application for termination pursuant to Section 705, shall post and maintain printed notices of such election or application on his or her premises, as prescribed by authorized regulation. Individuals in the employ of any employing unit which files an election to become an employer shall be given a reasonable opportunity to file objections or to be heard in the matter prior to the director’s approval of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

708.

(a) Any individual who is an employer under this division or any two or more individuals who have so qualified may file with the director a written election that their services shall be deemed to be services performed by individuals in employment for an employer for all the purposes of this division. Upon the approval of the election by the director, the services of those individuals shall be deemed to constitute employment for an employer for all of the purposes of this division. Regardless of their actual earnings, for the purposes of computing benefit rights and contributions under this division, they shall be deemed to have received the following remuneration for each calendar quarter:

(1) For purposes of unemployment insurance, the highest amount of wages required to be entitled to the maximum benefit amount provided in Section 1280.

(2) For purposes of disability insurance, the highest amount of wages required to be entitled to the maximum benefit amount provided in Section 2655.

(A) For disability insurance contributions on or after July 1, 1994, the quarterly contribution shall be the product of one-fourth of the amount of net profit, but not less than one thousand one hundred fifty dollars ($1,150) except when subparagraph (B) applies, reported on or before April 15 of the preceding year as declared on the Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE filed by an individual who is an employer under this division and the contribution rate established pursuant to Section 984.5, except as provided by Section 985. On January 1, 1995, quarterly income credits for the period from July 1, 1993, to June 30, 1994, inclusive, shall be changed to one-fourth of the amount of the net profit or four thousand six hundred dollars ($4,600), whichever is greater, reported on or before April 15, 1993, as declared on the Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE for the 1992 taxable year filed by each individual having an elective coverage agreement in effect for that period or any portion thereof. If no Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE was filed, the individual shall be assigned a quarterly income credit of one thousand one hundred fifty dollars ($1,150). Quarterly income credits for this period shall not exceed seven thousand nine hundred forty-two dollars ($7,942). If any quarterly income credit for the period from July 1, 1993, to June 30, 1994, inclusive, was reduced prior to January 1, 1995, the amended income credit shall be reduced proportionately. Benefits payable for periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 1995, shall be based on Section 2655. For purposes of this division, income credits shall be included in the term “wages.”

(B) The self-employed individual shall not pay contributions for periods of any disability, including periods for which some services are performed while disabled. The self-employed individual shall file a quarterly report of wages and certify as to the period of disability in order to maintain eligibility for elective disability insurance coverage and benefits. During periods of disability, the self-employed individual shall reduce his or her quarterly contributions by dividing the quarterly contribution amount by 91 to compute the daily contribution amount, and the daily contribution amount shall be multiplied by the number of days disabled to compute the amount by which the quarterly contributions shall be reduced. The department shall reduce income credits utilizing the same calculation method.

(b) Any individual who is an employer under this division or any two or more individuals who have so qualified may file with the director a written election that their services shall be deemed to be services performed by individuals in employment for an employer for the purposes of Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) only. Upon the approval of the election by the director, the services of those individuals shall be deemed to constitute employment for an employer for the purposes of Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) only. Regardless of their actual earnings, for the purposes of computing disability benefit rights and worker contributions, they shall be deemed to have received remuneration for each calendar quarter the highest amount of wages required to be entitled to the maximum benefit award provided in Section 2655. For contributions on or after July 1, 1994, the quarterly contribution shall be the product of one-fourth of the amount of net profit, but not less than one thousand one hundred fifty dollars ($1,150), except when subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) applies, reported on or before April 15 of the preceding year as declared on the Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE filed by an individual who is an employer under this division and the contribution rate established pursuant to Section 984.5, except as provided by Section 985. The quarterly contribution shall be reduced as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) if a disability occurred during the quarter for which payment is being made. On January 1, 1995, quarterly income credits for the period from July 1, 1993, to June 30, 1994, inclusive, shall be changed to one-fourth of the amount of the net profit or four thousand six hundred dollars ($4,600), whichever is greater, reported on or before April 15, 1993, as declared on the Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE for the 1992 taxable year filed by each individual having an elective coverage agreement in effect for that period or any portion thereof. If no Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE was filed, the individual shall be assigned a quarterly income credit of one thousand one hundred fifty dollars ($1,150). Quarterly income credits for this period shall not exceed seven thousand nine hundred forty-two dollars ($7,942). If quarterly income credits were reduced prior to January 1, 1995, the amended income credits shall be reduced proportionately. Benefits payable for periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 1995, shall be based on Section 2655. For purposes of this division, income credits shall be included in the term “wages.”

(c) (1) Any individual applying for or continuing elective coverage under this section shall be requested to sign an annual statement authorizing the department to verify the net profit declared on his or her Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE. Failure of the individual to sign a statement authorizing the department to verify income shall result in the individual being assigned an annual income level of four thousand six hundred dollars ($4,600) for contribution and benefit purposes.

(2) Any individual applying for elective coverage shall submit a copy of his or her Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE filed on or before April 15 of the preceding year with his or her application for elective coverage in order to establish first-year contributions and benefits in excess of the minimum required to qualify for elective coverage.

(d) Any self-employed individual continuing elective coverage who fails to file an Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE by April 15 of each calendar year is required to remit contributions based upon the last year the self-employed individual filed an Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE.

(e) Any self-employed individual who has not yet filed an Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE shall be assigned an annual income level of four thousand six hundred dollars ($4,600) for contribution and benefit purposes.

(f) Contributions required under this division are payable on and after the date stated in the approval of the director. The director may levy assessments under this division for any amount due when an elective coverage agreement has been in effect for less than two complete calendar years. Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1701), relating to the collection of amount due, shall apply to this section.

(g) No benefits shall be paid to any individual based upon remuneration deemed to have been received pursuant to this section unless all contributions due with respect to all remuneration deemed to have been received by the individual pursuant to this section have been paid to the department.

(h) No benefits shall be paid to any individual based on elective coverage income credits in his or her base period if his or her elective coverage agreement has been terminated under paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 704.1.

(i) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 2627, no benefits shall be paid to any individual covered under this section, with respect to periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 1994, until he or she has been unemployed and disabled for a waiting period of seven consecutive days during each disability benefit period.

(j) Notwithstanding Section 2653, with respect to periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 1994, the maximum amount of benefits payable to an individual covered under this section during any one disability benefit period shall be 39 times his or her weekly benefit amount, but in no case shall the total amount of benefits payable be more than the total wages credited to the individual during his or her disability base period. If the benefit is not a multiple of one dollar ($1), it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).

(k) For purposes of this section, Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE is defined as Internal Revenue Service Form 1040 Schedule SE, or in the case of statutory employees under the Internal Revenue Code, it shall be defined as Internal Revenue Service Form 1040 Schedule C, or the California Income Tax Return, when accompanied by Internal Revenue Service Form W-2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

708.5.

(a) Any individual who is self-employed, who is not an employer as defined in any provision of Article 3 (commencing with Section 675), of Chapter 3 of this part, and who receives the major part of his or her remuneration from the trade, business, or occupation in which he or she is self-employed, may file with the director a written election that his or her services in connection with his or her trade, business, or occupation shall be deemed to be services performed by an individual in employment for an employer for the purposes of Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) only. Upon the approval of the election by the director, the services of that self-employed individual in connection with his or her trade, business, or occupation shall be deemed to constitute employment for an employer for the purposes of Part 2 only of this division. Regardless of his or her actual earnings, for the purpose of computing disability benefit rights and worker contributions, he or she shall be deemed to have received remuneration for each calendar quarter the highest amount of wages required to be entitled to the maximum benefit award provided in Section 2655. For contributions on or after July 1, 1994, the quarterly contribution shall be the product of one-fourth of the amount of net profit, but not less than one thousand one hundred fifty dollars ($1,150), except when subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 708 applies, reported on or before April 15 of the preceding year as declared on the Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE filed by an individual who is an employer under this division and the contribution rate established pursuant to Section 984.5, except as provided by Section 985. The quarterly contribution shall be reduced as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 708 if a disability occurred during the quarter for which payment is being made. On January 1, 1995, quarterly income credits for the period from July 1, 1993, to June 30, 1994, inclusive, shall be changed to one-fourth of the net profit or four thousand six hundred dollars ($4,600), whichever is greater, reported on or before April 15, 1993, as declared on the Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE for the 1992 taxable year filed by each individual having an elective coverage agreement in effect for that period or any portion thereof. If no Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE was filed, the individual shall be assigned a quarterly income credit of one thousand one hundred fifty dollars ($1,150). Quarterly income credits for this period shall not exceed seven thousand nine hundred forty-two dollars ($7,942). If quarterly income credits for the period from July 1, 1993, to June 30, 1994, inclusive, were reduced prior to January 1, 1995, the amended income credits shall be reduced proportionately. Benefits payable for periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 1995, shall be based on the provisions of Section 2655. For purposes of this division, income credits shall be included in the term “wages.”
